Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-271
Partnership interest; personal property; interest in property.

A partnership interest is personal property. A partner has no interest in specific limited partnership property.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 44.